Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
REGISTRATION OF SECURITIES AND NOTICE

FILING OF
FEDERAL COVERED SECURITIES

[§485A-301] Securities registration
requirement. It is unlawful for a person to offer or sell a security in
this State unless:

(1) The security is a federal covered security;

(2) The security, transaction, or offer is exempted
from registration under sections 485A-201 to 485A-203; or

(3) The security is registered under this chapter. [L
2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next